Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-121
Agency, defined.

Agency shall mean a child placement agency licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 23.